Massachusetts, session 194th, H1908.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 270 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by adding Section 30:    
Section 30: Whoever distributes, delivers, gives away or sells, any packaged “Energy 
Drink” or other ingredient, substance or beverage that exceeds a caffeine content of seventy-one 
(71) milligrams per twelve (12) ounce serving and contains taurine and glucuronolactone or a 
packaged soft drink that is classified as a dietary supplement not regulated by the Food and Drug 
Administration and that contains eighty (80) or more milligrams of caffeine per eight (8) fluid 
ounces and generally includes a combination of methylxanthines, B vitamins and herbal 
ingredients which are advertised as being specifically designed to provide or increase energy to 
any persons under the age of eighteen (18) shall be punished by a fine not less than fifty (50) 
dollars for the first offense, one hundred (100) for the second offense and two hundred fifty 
(250) for the third offense.